Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2703.01
Unconstitutionality of amendatory provision; effect.

If the amendments to subdivision (2)(b)(ii) of section 69-2703 made by Laws 2004, LB 944, are held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unconstitutional, then the changes made by Laws 2004, LB 944, shall be deemed repealed and subdivision (2)(b)(ii) of section 69-2703 shall be deemed to be in the form as it existed prior to such amendments. Neither a holding of unconstitutionality nor an implied repeal of the amendment shall affect, impair, or invalidate any other portion of section 69-2703 or the application of such section to any other person or circumstance and those remaining portions of section 69-2703 shall at all times continue in full force and effect.

Laws 2004, LB 944, § 2.